North Carolina statutes. Chapter 163. Elections and Election Laws.
Article 10. Primary Elections.

§ 163-104.
Primaries governed by general election laws; authority of State Board of Elections to modify time schedule.

Unless otherwise provided in this Chapter, primary elections shall be conducted as far as practicable in accordance with the general election laws of this State. All provisions of this Chapter and of other laws governing elections, not inconsistent with
this Article and other provisions of law dealing specifically with primaries, shall apply as fully to primary elections and to the acts and things done thereunder as to general elections. Nevertheless, for purposes of primary elections
the State Board of Elections may, by general rule, modify the general election law time schedule with regard to ascertaining, declaring, and reporting results.

All acts made criminal if committed in connection with a general election shall likewise be criminal, with the same punishment, when committed in a primary election held under the provisions of this Chapter.

History.
1915, c. 101, s. 3; 1917, c. 218; C.S., s. 6020; 1967, c. 775, s. 1; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

Local Modification to Former G.S. 163-117 to 163-147.

Session Laws 1945, c. 894, repealed former Article 19, relating to primaries, insofar as its provisions apply to the nomination of Democratic candidates for the General Assembly and county offices in Mitchell County. Session Laws 1945, c. 894, was repealed
by Session Laws 1979, c. 210, which provides that this Article is applicable in Mitchell County.

Session Laws 1957, c. 826, as amended by Session Laws 1959, c. 621, s. 2, provided that the former Article should not apply to nominations of Democratic candidates for county offices and members of the House of Representatives in Cherokee County, but
such candidates should be nominated by convention of the Democratic Party.

Session Laws 1961, c. 484, provided that the former Article should not apply to nominations of Republican candidates for county offices and members of the General Assembly in Cherokee County, but such candidates should be nominated by conventions of the
Republican Party.

Session Laws 1953, c. 1069, as amended by Session Laws 1959, c. 238, made the former Article applicable to Watauga County.

Session Laws 1955, c. 439, to the extent provided, made the former Article applicable to Yancey County.

Session Laws 1955, c. 442, made the former Article applicable to the Counties of Avery, Madison, Mitchell and Yancey for the purpose of nominating Democratic candidates for the state senates.

Elections for Judicial Offices 2018.

Session Laws 2018-13, s. 2(a)-(d), as amended by 2018-130, 1st Ex. Sess., ss. 2, 3, provides: “(a) The General Assembly finds that both chambers of the General Assembly have carefully examined judicial redistricting and the forms of judicial selection
with multiple committees considering various proposals of selection and new judicial district maps. The General Assembly finds that, to allow for more time to thoughtfully consider these changes, the General Assembly enacted S.L. 2017-214,
the Electoral Freedom Act of 2017, which, among other items, provided for a one-time cancellation of partisan primaries for the offices of district court judge, superior court judge, judges of the Court of Appeals, and Supreme Court
justices for the 2018 election cycle. The General Assembly finds that all elections for judges in 2018 were to be treated uniformly under S.L. 2017-214, the Electoral Freedom Act of 2017, while those changes were considered.

“The General Assembly notes that election to these offices will be held under a plurality election system, with candidates running under a political party label on the ballot, without having gone through a party primary. The General Assembly finds that
ballot language above the sections of 2018 general election ballots regarding these impacted offices setting forth the listed party affiliation of a candidate at least 90 days prior to the time of filing, consistent with G.S. 163A-973,
would aid voters’ understanding of the 2018 judicial races.

“(b) For the 2018 general election, the State Board of Elections and Ethics Enforcement shall, notwithstanding G.S. 163A-1114(b)(2), list the following judicial offices at the end of all partisan offices listed on the general election ballot:

“(1) Justices of the Supreme Court.

“(2) Judges of the Court of Appeals.

“(3) Judges of the superior courts.

“(4) Judges of the district courts.

“(c) Notwithstanding G.S. 163A-1112, immediately prior to the placement of the judicial offices listed in subsection (b) of this section on the ballot, the following information shall be printed:

“No primaries for judicial office were held in 2018. The party information by each of the following candidates’ names is shown only if the candidates’ party affiliation or unaffiliated status is the same as on their voter registration at the time they
filed to run for office and 90 days prior to that filing.

“(d) Except as provided in this section, ballot order for the judicial offices listed in subsection (b) of this section shall be as provided in Section 4(j) of S.L. 2017-214.”

Session Laws 2017-214, s. 4(a)-(k), as amended by Session Laws 2018-130, 1st Ex. Sess., ss. 1, 3.1, provides: “(a) No 2018 Primary for Judicial Offices. — Notwithstanding

G.S. 163-106

, no party primaries shall be held for candidates seeking the following offices in the general election held on November 6, 2018:

“Justices of the Supreme Court.

“Judges of the Court of Appeals.

“Judges of the superior courts.

“Judges of the district courts.

“Candidates seeking the office of Justice of the Supreme Court, judge of the Court of Appeals, judge of the superior court, or judge of the district court shall file their notice of candidacy with the State Board of Elections and Ethics Enforcement no
earlier than 12:00 noon on June 18, 2018, and no later than 12:00 noon on June 29, 2018.

“(b) Form of Notice. — Each person offering to be a candidate for election shall do so by filing a notice of candidacy with the State Board of Elections and Ethics Enforcement in the following form, inserting the words in parentheses when appropriate:

“Date _______________

“I hereby file notice that I am a candidate for election to the office of _______________ in the regular election to be held _______________ .

“Signed _______________

“(Name of Candidate)

“Witness: _________

“The notice of candidacy shall be either signed in the presence of the chair or secretary of the State Board of Elections and Ethics Enforcement or signed and acknowledged before an officer authorized to take acknowledgments who shall certify the notice
under seal. An acknowledged and certified notice may be mailed to the State Board of Elections and Ethics Enforcement. In signing a notice of candidacy, the candidate shall use only the candidate’s legal name and, in the candidate’s
discretion, any nickname by which commonly known. A candidate may also, in lieu of that candidate’s first name and legal middle initial or middle name, if any, sign that candidate’s nickname, provided the candidate appends to the notice
of candidacy an affidavit that the candidate has been commonly known by that nickname for at least five years prior to the date of making the affidavit. The candidate shall also include with the affidavit the way the candidate’s name
(as permitted by law) should be listed on the ballot if another candidate with the same last name files a notice of candidacy for that office.

“A notice of candidacy signed by an agent or any person other than the candidate shall be invalid.

“A candidate, at the time of filing the notice of candidacy under this section, shall indicate on the notice of candidacy the political party recognized under Article 18 of Chapter 163A of the General Statutes with which that candidate is affiliated or
any unaffiliated status. If the candidate’s political party affiliation or unaffiliated status is the same as on their voter registration at the time they filed to run for office and 90 days prior to that filing, the political party
designation or unaffiliated status shall be included on the ballot.

“(c) Withdrawal of Notice of Candidacy. — Any person who has filed a notice of candidacy for an office under this section shall have the right to withdraw it at any time prior to either of the following:

“(1) The close of business on the third business day prior to the date on which the right to file for that office expires under the terms of subsection (b) of this section.

“(2) The close of business August 8, 2018.”

“(d) Certificate That Candidate Is Registered Voter. — Candidates shall file along with their notice a certificate signed by the chair of the board of elections or the director of elections of the county in which they are registered to vote, stating that
the person is registered to vote in that county, and if the candidacy is for superior court judge or district court judge, and the county contains more than one superior court district or district court district, stating the judicial
district of which the person is a resident. In issuing such certificate, the chairman or director shall check the registration records of the county to verify such information. During the period commencing 36 hours immediately preceding
the filing deadline, the State Board of Elections and Ethics Enforcement shall accept, on a conditional basis, the notice of candidacy of a candidate who has failed to secure the verification ordered herein subject to receipt of verification
no later than three days following the filing deadline. The State Board of Elections and Ethics Enforcement shall prescribe the form for such certificate and distribute it to each county board of elections no later than the last Monday
in December of 2017.

“(e) Candidacy for More Than One Office Prohibited. — No person may file a notice of candidacy for more than one office or group of offices described in subsection (a) of this section, or for an office or group of offices described in subsection (a) of
this section and an office described in G.S. 163-106(c), for any one election. If a person has filed a notice of candidacy with a board of elections under this section or under G.S. 163-106(c) for one office or group of offices, then
a notice of candidacy may not later be filed for any other office or group of offices under this section when the election is on the same date unless the notice of candidacy for the first office is withdrawn under subsection (c) of
this section.

“(f) Notice of Candidacy for Certain Offices to Indicate Vacancy. — In any election in which there are two or more vacancies for the office of justice of the Supreme Court, judge of the Court of Appeals, superior court judge, or district court judge to
be filled by nominations, each candidate shall, at the time of filing notice of candidacy, file with the State Board of Elections and Ethics Enforcement a written statement designating the vacancy to which the candidate seeks election.
Votes cast for a candidate shall be effective only for election to the vacancy for which the candidate has given notice of candidacy as provided in this subsection.

“A person seeking election for a specialized district judgeship established under

G.S. 7A-147

shall, at the time of filing notice of candidacy, file with the State Board of Elections and Ethics Enforcement a written statement designating the specialized judgeship to which the person seeks nomination.

“(g) Residency Requirements. — No person may file a notice of candidacy for superior court judge or district court judge unless that person is at the time of filing the notice of candidacy a resident of the judicial district as it will exist at the time
the person would take office if elected. This subsection implements Section 9(1) of Article IV of the North Carolina Constitution, which requires regular superior court judges to reside in the district for which elected, and Section
10 of Article IV of the North Carolina Constitution, which requires every district court judge to reside in the district for which elected.

“(h) Filing Fees. — Candidates shall pay filing fees as required by

G.S. 163-107

and

G.S. 163-107

.1.

“(i) Failure of Candidates to File; Death or Other Disqualification of a Candidate; No Withdrawal From Candidacy. —

“(1) Insufficient number of candidates. — If when the filing period expires, candidates have not filed for an office to be filled under this section, the State Board of Elections and Ethics Enforcement shall extend the filing period for five days for
any such offices.

“(2) Vacancies; reopening filing. — If only one or two candidates have filed for a single office, or the number of candidates filed for a group of offices does not exceed twice the number of positions to be filled, and thereafter a remaining candidate
dies or otherwise becomes disqualified before the election and before the ballots are printed, the State Board of Elections and Ethics Enforcement shall, upon notification of the death or other disqualification, immediately reopen
the filing period for an additional five days during which time additional candidates shall be permitted to file for election. If the ballots have been printed at the time the State Board of Elections and Ethics Enforcement receives
notice of the candidate’s death or other disqualification, the Board shall determine whether there will be sufficient time to reprint them before the election if the filing period is reopened for three days. If the Board determines
that there will be sufficient time to reprint the ballots, it shall reopen the filing period for three days to allow other candidates to file for election.

“(3) Later vacancies; ballots not reprinted. — If the ballots have been printed at the time the State Board of Elections and Ethics Enforcement receives notice of a candidate’s death or other disqualification, and if the Board determines that there is
not enough time to reprint the ballots before the election if the filing period is reopened for three days, then regardless of the number of candidates remaining for the office or group of offices, the ballots shall not be reprinted
and the name of the vacated candidate shall remain on the ballots. If a vacated candidate should poll the highest number of votes in the election for a single office or enough votes to be elected to one of a group of offices, the State
Board of Elections and Ethics Enforcement shall declare the office vacant and it shall be filled in the manner provided by law.

“(4) No withdrawal permitted of living, qualified candidate after close of filing. — After the close of the candidate filing period, a candidate who has filed a notice of candidacy for an office under this section, who has not withdrawn notice before
the close of filing as permitted by subsection (c) of this section, who remains alive, and has not become disqualified for the office may not withdraw his or her candidacy. That candidate’s name shall remain on the ballot, any votes
cast for the candidacy shall be counted in primary or election, and if the candidate wins, the candidate may fail to qualify by refusing to take the oath of office.

“(5) Death, disqualification, or failure to qualify after election. — If a person elected to the office of justice of the Supreme Court, judge of the Court of Appeals, or superior or district court judge dies or becomes disqualified on or after election
day and before that person has qualified by taking the oath of office, or fails to qualify by refusing to take the oath of office, the office shall be deemed vacant and shall be filled as provided by law.

“(j) Ballot Order. — For the 2018 general election, the State Board of Elections and Ethics Enforcement shall place elections for the offices elected as provided in this section with other partisan offices, as provided in G.S. 163-165.6(b)(3). Order of
candidates for those offices shall be determined as provided in G.S. 163-165.6(c).

“(k) Determination of Election Winners. — A general election for all candidates seeking office as provided in this section shall be held on November 6, 2018. In the general election, the candidate for a single office receiving the highest number of votes
shall be elected. Those candidates for a group of offices receiving the highest number of votes, equal in number to the number of positions to be filled, shall be elected. If two candidates receiving the highest number of votes each
received the same number of votes, the State Board of Elections and Ethics Enforcement shall determine the winner by lot.”

§ 163-105.
Payment of expense of conducting primary elections.

The expense of printing and distributing the poll and registration books and blanks to be furnished by the State, and the per diem and expenses of the State Board of Elections while engaged in the discharge of primary election duties imposed by law upon
that Board, shall be paid by the State.

The expenses of printing and distributing ballots pursuant to

G.S. 163-165.3

and the per diem (or salary) and expenses of the county board of elections and the chief judges and judges of election, while engaged in the discharge of primary election duties imposed by law upon them, shall be paid
by the counties.

History.
1915, c. 101, s. 7; 1917, c. 218; C.S., s. 6026; 1927, c. 260, s. 21; 1933, c. 165, s. 14; 1967, c. 775, s. 1; 1985, c. 563, s. 1; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 762, s. 30; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b); 2020-69,
s. 5.5.

§ 163-106.
Notices of candidacy; pledge; with whom filed; date for filing.

Notice and Pledge. — No one shall be voted for in a primary election without having filed a notice of candidacy with the appropriate board of elections, State or county, as required by this section and

G.S. 163-106.1

, 163-106.2, 163-106.3, 163-106.5, and 163-106.6. To this end every candidate for selection as the nominee of a political party shall file with and place in the possession of the board of elections specified in

G.S. 163-106.2

, a notice and pledge in the following form: Click to view

Each candidate shall sign the notice of candidacy in the presence of the chairman or secretary of the board of elections, State or county, with which the candidate files. In the alternative, a candidate may have the candidate’s signature on the notice
of candidacy acknowledged and certified to by an officer authorized to take acknowledgments and administer oaths, in which case the candidate may mail or deliver by commercial courier service the candidate’s notice of candidacy
to the appropriate board of elections.

[Name of Candidate. —] In signing the notice of candidacy the candidate shall use only that candidate’s legal name and may use any nickname by which he is commonly known. A candidate may also, in lieu of that candidate’s legal first name and legal middle
initial or middle name (if any) sign a nickname, provided that the candidate appends to the notice of candidacy an affidavit that the candidate has been commonly known by that nickname for at least five years prior to the date
of making the affidavit. The candidate shall also include with the affidavit the way that candidate’s name (as permitted by law) should be listed on the ballot if another candidate with the same last name files a notice of candidacy
for that office.

[Agent’s Signature Invalid. —] A notice of candidacy signed by an agent or any person other than the candidate shall be invalid.

[Forms Provided by State Board. —] Prior to the date on which candidates may commence filing, the State Board of Elections shall print and furnish, at State expense, to each county board of elections a sufficient number of the notice of candidacy forms
prescribed by this subsection for use by candidates required to file with county boards of elections.

Except for candidates to the office of sheriff as provided in subsection (f) of this section, at the same time the candidate files notice of candidacy under this section and

G.S. 163-106.1

, 163-106.2, 163-106.3, 163-106,5, and 163-106.6, the candidate shall file with the same office a statement answering the following question: “Have you ever been convicted of a felony?” The State Board of Elections
shall adapt the notice of candidacy form to include the statement required by this subsection. The form shall make clear that a felony conviction need not be disclosed if the conviction was dismissed as a result of reversal on
appeal or resulted in a pardon of innocence or expungement. The form shall require a candidate who answers “yes” to the question to provide the name of the offense, the date of conviction, the date of the restoration of citizenship
rights, and the county and state of conviction. The form shall require the candidate to swear or affirm that the statements on the form are true, correct, and complete to the best of the candidate’s knowledge or belief. The form
shall be available as a public record in the office of the board of elections where the candidate files notice of candidacy and shall contain an explanation that a prior felony conviction does not preclude holding elective office
if the candidate’s rights of citizenship have been restored. This subsection shall also apply to individuals who become candidates for election by the people under

G.S. 163-114

, 163-122, 163-123, 163-98, 115C-37, 130A-50, Article 24 of this Chapter, or any other statute or local act. Those individuals shall complete the question at the time the documents are filed initiating their candidacy.
The State Board of Elections shall adapt those documents to include the statement required by this subsection. If an individual does not complete the statement required by this subsection, the board of elections accepting the filing
shall notify the individual of the omission, and the individual shall have 48 hours after notice to complete the statement. If the individual does not complete the statement at the time of filing or within 48 hours after the notice,
the individual’s filing is not complete, the individual’s name shall not appear on the ballot as a candidate, and votes for that individual shall not be counted. It is a Class I felony to complete the form knowing that information
as to felony conviction or restoration of citizenship is untrue. This subsection shall not apply to candidates required by G.S. 138A-22(f) to file Statements of Economic Interest.

Every candidate to the office of sheriff, at the time of filing the notice of candidacy, shall file a valid disclosure statement prepared in accordance with G.S. 17E-20 verifying that the candidate has no prior felony convictions or expungements of felony
convictions. If a candidate does not file such valid disclosure statement required by this subsection, that candidate’s filing is not complete, the candidate’s name shall not appear on the ballot as a candidate, and votes for that
candidate shall not be counted in accordance with Section 2 of Article VII of the North Carolina Constitution.

Date I hereby file notice as a candidate for nomination as in the party primary election to be held on , I affiliate with the party, (and I certify that I am now regis- tered on the registration records of the precinct in which I reside as an affiliate
of the party.) I pledge that if I am defeated in the primary, I will not run for the same office as a write-in candidate in the next general election. Signed (Name of Candidate) Witness: (Title of witness)

History.
1915, c. 101, ss. 6, 15; 1917, c. 218; C.S., ss. 6022, 6035; 1921, c. 217; 1923, c. 111, s. 13; C.S., s. 6055(a); 1927, c. 260, s. 19; 1929, c. 26, s. 1; 1933, c. 165, s. 12; 1937, c. 364; 1947, c. 505, s. 7; 1949, c. 672,
s. 4; c. 932; 1951, c. 1009, s. 3; 1955, c. 755; c. 871, s. 1; 1959, c. 1203, s. 4; 1965, c. 262; 1967, c. 775, s. 1; c. 1063, s. 2; 1969, c. 44, s. 83; c. 1190, s. 56; 1971, cc. 189, 675, 798; 1973, c. 47, s. 2; c. 793, s. 36; c.
862; 1975, c. 844, s. 2; 1977, c. 265, ss. 4, 5; c. 408, s. 2; c. 661, ss. 2, 3; 1979, c. 24; c. 411, s. 5; 1981, c. 32, ss. 1, 2; 1983, c. 330, s. 1; 1985, c. 472, s. 2; c. 558, s. 1; c. 759, s. 6; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 957,
s. 1; 1987, c. 509, s. 13; c. 738, s. 124; 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 1028, s. 1; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 762, s. 31; 1995, c. 243, s. 1; 1996, 2nd Ex. Sess., c. 9, s. 8; 1999-456, s. 59; 2001-403, s. 3; 2001-466, s. 5.1(a); 2002-158,
ss. 8, 9; 2002-159, s. 55(a); 2006-155, s. 2; 2007-369, s. 1; 2009-47, s. 1; 2013-381, s. 21.1; 2014-111, s. 1(a); 2016-125, 4th Ex. Sess., s. 21(a); 2017-3, s. 5; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b); 2021-107, s. 2.

Local Modification.

Pasquotank: 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 612, s. 1; Halifax County Board of Elections: 1983 (Reg. Sess., 1984), c. 984; Stanly County Board of Education: 2011-175, s. 1.

Cross References.

As to prohibition on not running for two separate offices at the same time, see

G.S. 163-124

.

2016 General Primary Election.

Session Laws 2015-258, s. 2(a)-(k), as amended by Session Laws 2016-2, Ex. Sess., s. 2(b), provides: “(a) General Primary Date. — Notwithstanding

G.S. 163-1(b)

, the primary election in 2016 shall be conducted on the same date as the 2016 presidential preference primary, as established by subsection (b) of Section 1 of this act [March 15, 2016].

“(b) Filing Period. — Notwithstanding

G.S. 163-106

, the filing period for the 2016 primary shall open at 12:00 noon on Tuesday, December 1, 2015, and close at 12:00 noon on Monday, December 21, 2015.

“(c) Eligibility to File. — Notwithstanding

G.S. 163-106

, no person shall be permitted to file as a candidate in a party primary unless that person has been affiliated with that party for at least 75 days as of the date of that person filing such notice of candidacy. A person
registered as ‘Unaffiliated’ shall be ineligible to file as a candidate in a party primary election.

“(d) Repealed by Session Laws 2016-2, Ex. Sess., s. 2(b).

“(e) Special Elections. — Any special election authorized by statute or local act that is set for May 2016 shall be placed on the ballot at the time of the presidential preference primary, as established by subsection (b) of Section 1 of this act [March
15, 2016], unless the unit of government calling the special election affirmatively changes the date for the special election to another date in accordance with

G.S. 163-287

.

“(f) Statement of Economic Interest. — Notwithstanding

G.S. 138A-22

, the statement of economic interest required of any candidate for elective office subject to Article 2 of Chapter 138A of the General Statutes shall be filed with the State Ethics Commission on or before February 1,
2016.

“(g) Campaign Finance Reports. — Notwithstanding Article 22A of Chapter 163 of the General Statutes, the following changes shall be made to the required campaign finance reports:

“(1) The report for the first quarter shall be due Monday, March 7, 2016, and shall cover the period through February 29, 2016.

“(2) The report for the second quarter shall also cover March 2016.

“(h) Temporary Orders. — In order to accommodate the scheduling of the 2016 primary before the Tuesday after the first Monday in May, the State Board of Elections may issue temporary orders that may change, modify, delete, amend, or add to any statute
contained in Chapter 163 of the General Statutes, any rules contained in Title 8 of the North Carolina Administrative Code, or any other election regulation or guideline that may affect the 2016 primary elections. These temporary orders
shall only be effective for the 2016 primary elections.

“(i) Orders, Not Rules. — Orders issued under this section are not rules subject to the provisions of Chapter 150B of the General Statutes. Orders issued under this section shall be published in the North Carolina Register upon issuance.

“(j) Expiration of Orders. — Any orders issued under this section become void 10 days after the final certification of all 2016 primary elections. This section expires 10 days after the final certification of all 2016 primary elections.

“(k) Definition. — As used in this section, ‘order’ also includes guidelines and directives.”

Session Laws 2016-2, Ex. Sess., s. 1(a)-(f), provides: “Conduct of 2016 U.S. House of Representatives Primary Election. — Notwithstanding Section 2 of S.L. 2015-258, the 2016 U.S. House of Representatives primary election shall be conducted as provided
in this act.

“U.S. House of Representatives Primary Election Date. — Notwithstanding

G.S. 163-1(b)

, the 2016 U.S. House of Representatives primary election shall be held on Tuesday, June 7, 2016.

“Filing Period for the U.S. House of Representatives Primary Election. — Notwithstanding

G.S. 163-106

and Section 2 of S.L. 2015-258, the filing period for the 2016 U.S. House of Representatives primary shall open at 12:00 noon on Wednesday, March 16, 2016, and close at 12:00 noon on Friday, March 25, 2016.

“Eligibility to File. — Notwithstanding

G.S. 163-106

, no person shall be permitted to file as a candidate in the 2016 U.S. House of Representatives primary unless that person has been affiliated with that party for at least 75 days as of the date of that person filing
such notice of candidacy. A person registered as ‘Unaffiliated’ shall be ineligible to file as a candidate in a party primary election.

“No Run for Two Separate Offices at the Same Time. — A candidate who is certified as the winner of a primary election on March 15 and certified as the winner of a primary election on June 7 shall withdraw the notice of candidacy for one of those races
no later than one week after the certification of both primary election results in order to comply with

G.S. 163-124

.

“Return of Filing Fee. — Any candidate who has filed notice of candidacy for the office of 2016 U.S. House of Representatives prior to enactment of this act shall be entitled to return of that candidate’s filing fee.”

§ 163-106.1.
Eligibility to file.

No person shall be permitted to file as a candidate in a party primary unless that person has been affiliated with that party for at least 90 days as of the date of that person filing such notice of candidacy. A person registered as “unaffiliated” shall
be ineligible to file as a candidate in a party primary election.

History.
1915, c. 101, ss. 6, 15; 1917, c. 218; C.S., ss. 6022, 6035; 1921, c. 217; 1923, c. 111, s. 13; C.S., s. 6055(a); 1927, c. 260, s. 19; 1929, c. 26, s. 1; 1933, c. 165, s. 12; 1937, c. 364; 1947, c. 505, s. 7; 1949, c. 672,
s. 4; c. 932; 1951, c. 1009, s. 3; 1955, c. 755; c. 871, s. 1; 1959, c. 1203, s. 4; 1965, c. 262; 1967, c. 775, s. 1; c. 1063, s. 2; 1969, c. 44, s. 83; c. 1190, s. 56; 1971, cc. 189, 675, 798; 1973, c. 47, s. 2; c. 793, s. 36; c.
862; 1975, c. 844, s. 2; 1977, c. 265, ss. 4, 5; c. 408, s. 2; c. 661, ss. 2, 3; 1979, c. 24; c. 411, s. 5; 1981, c. 32, ss. 1, 2; 1983, c. 330, s. 1; 1985, c. 472, s. 2; c. 558, s. 1; c. 759, s. 6; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 957,
s. 1; 1987, c. 509, s. 13; c. 738, s. 124; 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 1028, s. 1; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 762, s. 31; 1995, c. 243, s. 1; 1996, 2nd Ex. Sess., c. 9, s. 8; 1999-456, s. 59; 2001-403, s. 3; 2001-466, s. 5.1(a); 2002-158,
ss. 8, 9; 2002-159, s. 55(a); 2006-155, s. 2; 2007-369, s. 1; 2009-47, s. 1; 2013-381, s. 21.1; 2014-111, s. 1(a); 2016-125, 4th Ex. Sess., s. 21(a); 2017-3, s. 5; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

Local Modification.

Pasquotank: 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 612, s. 1; Halifax County Board of Elections: 1983 (Reg. Sess., 1984), c. 984; Stanly County Board of Education: 2011-175, s. 1.

Cross References.

As to prohibition on not running for two separate offices at the same time, see

G.S. 163-124

.

§ 163-106.2.
Time for filing notice of candidacy.

Candidates seeking party primary nominations for the following offices shall file their notice of candidacy with the State Board no earlier than 12:00 noon on the first Monday in December and no later than 12:00 noon on the third Friday in December preceding
the primary:GovernorLieutenant GovernorAll State executive officersJustices of the Supreme CourtJudges of the Court of AppealsJudges of the superior courtJudges of the district courtUnited States SenatorsMembers of the House of
Representatives of the United StatesDistrict attorneys

Candidates seeking party primary nominations for the following offices shall file their notice of candidacy with the county board of elections no earlier than 12:00 noon on the first Monday in December and no later than 12:00 noon on the third Friday
in December preceding the primary:State SenatorsMembers of the State House of RepresentativesAll county offices.

History.
1915, c. 101, ss. 6, 15; 1917, c. 218; C.S., ss. 6022, 6035; 1921, c. 217; 1923, c. 111, s. 13; C.S., s. 6055(a); 1927, c. 260, s. 19; 1929, c. 26, s. 1; 1933, c. 165, s. 12; 1937, c. 364; 1947, c. 505, s. 7; 1949, c. 672,
s. 4; c. 932; 1951, c. 1009, s. 3; 1955, c. 755; c. 871, s. 1; 1959, c. 1203, s. 4; 1965, c. 262; 1967, c. 775, s. 1; c. 1063, s. 2; 1969, c. 44, s. 83; c. 1190, s. 56; 1971, cc. 189, 675, 798; 1973, c. 47, s. 2; c. 793, s. 36; c.
862; 1975, c. 844, s. 2; 1977, c. 265, ss. 4, 5; c. 408, s. 2; c. 661, ss. 2, 3; 1979, c. 24; c. 411, s. 5; 1981, c. 32, ss. 1, 2; 1983, c. 330, s. 1; 1985, c. 472, s. 2; c. 558, s. 1; c. 759, s. 6; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 957,
s. 1; 1987, c. 509, s. 13; c. 738, s. 124; 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 1028, s. 1; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 762, s. 31; 1995, c. 243, s. 1; 1996, 2nd Ex. Sess., c. 9, s. 8; 1999-456, s. 59; 2001-403, s. 3; 2001-466, s. 5.1(a); 2002-158,
ss. 8, 9; 2002-159, s. 55(a); 2006-155, s. 2; 2007-369, s. 1; 2009-47, s. 1; 2013-381, s. 21.1; 2014-111, s. 1(a); 2016-125, 4th Ex. Sess., s. 21(a); 2017-3, s. 5; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-21, s. 2; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

Local Modification.

Pasquotank: 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 612, s. 1; Halifax County Board of Elections: 1983 (Reg. Sess., 1984), c. 984; Stanly County Board of Education: 2011-175, s. 1.

Cross References.

As to prohibition on not running for two separate offices at the same time, see

G.S. 163-124

.

§ 163-106.3.
Notice of candidacy for certain offices to indicate vacancy.

In any primary in which there are two or more vacancies for associate justices for the Supreme Court, two or more vacancies for the Court of Appeals, two or more vacancies for superior or district court judge, or two vacancies for United States Senator
from North Carolina, each candidate shall, at the time of filing notice of candidacy, file with the State Board of Elections a written statement designating the vacancy to which the candidate seeks nomination. The designation shall
not be the name or names of any incumbent or other individual but shall be designated as determined by the State Board of Elections. A person seeking election for a specialized district judgeship established under

G.S. 7A-147

shall, at the time of filing notice of candidacy, file with the State Board of Elections a written statement designating the specialized judgeship to which the person seeks nomination. Votes cast for a candidate shall
be effective only for nomination to the vacancy for which the candidate has given notice of candidacy as provided in this section.

History.
1915, c. 101, ss. 6, 15; 1917, c. 218; C.S., ss. 6022, 6035; 1921, c. 217; 1923, c. 111, s. 13; C.S., s. 6055(a); 1927, c. 260, s. 19; 1929, c. 26, s. 1; 1933, c. 165, s. 12; 1937, c. 364; 1947, c. 505, s. 7; 1949, c. 672,
s. 4; c. 932; 1951, c. 1009, s. 3; 1955, c. 755; c. 871, s. 1; 1959, c. 1203, s. 4; 1965, c. 262; 1967, c. 775, s. 1; c. 1063, s. 2; 1969, c. 44, s. 83; c. 1190, s. 56; 1971, cc. 189, 675, 798; 1973, c. 47, s. 2; c. 793, s. 36; c.
862; 1975, c. 844, s. 2; 1977, c. 265, ss. 4, 5; c. 408, s. 2; c. 661, ss. 2, 3; 1979, c. 24; c. 411, s. 5; 1981, c. 32, ss. 1, 2; 1983, c. 330, s. 1; 1985, c. 472, s. 2; c. 558, s. 1; c. 759, s. 6; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 957,
s. 1; 1987, c. 509, s. 13; c. 738, s. 124; 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 1028, s. 1; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 762, s. 31; 1995, c. 243, s. 1; 1996, 2nd Ex. Sess., c. 9, s. 8; 1999-456, s. 59; 2001-403, s. 3; 2001-466, s. 5.1(a); 2002-158,
ss. 8, 9; 2002-159, s. 55(a); 2006-155, s. 2; 2007-369, s. 1; 2009-47, s. 1; 2013-381, s. 21.1; 2014-111, s. 1(a); 2016-125, 4th Ex. Sess., s. 21(a); 2017-3, s. 5; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-121, s. 4(b); 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

Local Modification.

Pasquotank: 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 612, s. 1; Halifax County Board of Elections: 1983 (Reg. Sess., 1984), c. 984; Stanly County Board of Education: 2011-175, s. 1.

Cross References.

As to prohibition on not running for two separate offices at the same time, see

G.S. 163-124

.

§ 163-106.4.
Withdrawal of notice of candidacy.

Any person who has filed notice of candidacy for an office shall have the right to withdraw it at any time prior to the close of business on the third business day prior to the date on which the right to file for that office expires under the terms of

G.S. 163-106.2

. If a candidate does not withdraw before the deadline, except as provided in

G.S. 163-112

, his name shall be printed on the primary ballot, any votes for him shall be counted, and he shall not be refunded his filing fee.

History.
1915, c. 101, ss. 6, 15; 1917, c. 218; C.S., ss. 6022, 6035; 1921, c. 217; 1923, c. 111, s. 13; C.S., s. 6055(a); 1927, c. 260, s. 19; 1929, c. 26, s. 1; 1933, c. 165, s. 12; 1937, c. 364; 1947, c. 505, s. 7; 1949, c. 672,
s. 4; c. 932; 1951, c. 1009, s. 3; 1955, c. 755; c. 871, s. 1; 1959, c. 1203, s. 4; 1965, c. 262; 1967, c. 775, s. 1; c. 1063, s. 2; 1969, c. 44, s. 83; c. 1190, s. 56; 1971, cc. 189, 675, 798; 1973, c. 47, s. 2; c. 793, s. 36; c.
862; 1975, c. 844, s. 2; 1977, c. 265, ss. 4, 5; c. 408, s. 2; c. 661, ss. 2, 3; 1979, c. 24; c. 411, s. 5; 1981, c. 32, ss. 1, 2; 1983, c. 330, s. 1; 1985, c. 472, s. 2; c. 558, s. 1; c. 759, s. 6; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 957,
s. 1; 1987, c. 509, s. 13; c. 738, s. 124; 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 1028, s. 1; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 762, s. 31; 1995, c. 243, s. 1; 1996, 2nd Ex. Sess., c. 9, s. 8; 1999-456, s. 59; 2001-403, s. 3; 2001-466, s. 5.1(a); 2002-158,
ss. 8, 9; 2002-159, s. 55(a); 2006-155, s. 2; 2007-369, s. 1; 2009-47, s. 1; 2013-381, s. 21.1; 2014-111, s. 1(a); 2017-3, s. 5; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

Local Modification.

Pasquotank: 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 612, s. 1; Halifax County Board of Elections: 1983 (Reg. Sess., 1984), c. 984; Stanly County Board of Education: 2011-175, s. 1.

Cross References.

As to prohibition on not running for two separate offices at the same time, see

G.S. 163-124

.